North Carolina, session 2025, HB858.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of twenty million four hundred forty thousand dollars
($20,440,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to
the Town of Davidson to be used as follows:
(1) Seventeen million dollars ($17,000,000) for construction of a new fire station.
(2) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for emergency vehicle purchases.
(3) One hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for police equipment to enhance
community safety.
(4) Three hundred forty thousand dollars ($340,000) for breathing apparatus.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of six million dollars ($6,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for
the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to the Town of Cornelius to be used as
follows:
(1) Three million dollars ($3,000,000) for acquisition of property for the
construction of a public safety facility.
(2) One million dollars ($1,000,000) to replace the fire department radios.
(3) Two million dollars ($2,000,000) to improve pedestrian safety at the
intersection of NC 115/Catawba Ave.
SECTION 3. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of forty-seven million six hundred eighty-three thousand seven
hundred eighty dollars ($47,683,780) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to
provide a directed grant to the Town of Huntersville to be used as follows:
(1) One hundred one thousand seven hundred eighty dollars ($101,780) for new
firetruck apparatus.
(2) Eight hundred fourteen thousand dollars ($814,000) for breathing apparatus.
(3) Nine hundred ninety-eight thousand dollars ($998,000) for a new firetruck.
(4) One hundred ninety thousand dollars ($190,000) for anti-vehicle barriers.
(5) Five hundred eighty thousand dollars ($580,000) for 10 additional police
vehicles.
(6) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) for the construction of a new fire station.
*H858-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) Thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) for the construction of a new police
facility.
SECTION 4. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 House Bill 858-First Edition